Massachusetts, session 194th, H2287.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 21(3) of chapter 40 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2012 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end the following sentence:-- Such by-laws shall
apply to sidewalks abutting privately-owned property within the state highway system of the
Massachusetts department of transportation and the parkways and public ways of the department
of conservation and recreation, unless such by-law is clearly inconsistent with a rule or
regulation promulgated by either of such departments. Enforcement can be undertaken by local
municipalities provided that the revenue shall be split with the parties through a further
memorandum of understanding.
of 1